Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 OUTDOOR HERITAGE FUND Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the outdoor heritage fund for the fiscal year indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. The appropriations in this article are onetime appropriations. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin OUTDOOR HERITAGE FUNDnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 162,111,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 775,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is from the outdoor heritage fund. The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prairies new text end new text begin 33,432,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Martin County DNR WMA Acquisition, Phase 9 new text end new text begin $1,332,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and restore and enhance strategic prairie grassland, wetland, and other wildlife habitat in Martin County for wildlife management area purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8, as follows: $970,000 to Fox Lake Conservation League, Inc., $327,000 to Ducks Unlimited, and $35,000 to the Conservation Fund. new text end new text begin (b) Prairie Chicken Habitat Partnership of the Southern Red River Valley, Phase 11 new text end new text begin $3,607,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Pheasants Forever, in cooperation with the Minnesota Prairie Chicken Society, to acquire land in fee and restore and enhance lands in the southern Red River Valley for wildlife management purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8, or to be designated and managed as waterfowl production areas in Minnesota, in cooperation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquisitions of lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. new text end new text begin (c) RIM Grasslands Reserve, Phase 6 new text end new text begin $3,375,000 the first year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance grassland habitat under Minnesota Statutes, sections 103F.501 to 103F.531. Of this amount, up to $70,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (d) RIM Buffers for Wildlife and Water, Phase 11 new text end new text begin $4,000,000 the first year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources to acquire permanent conservation easements and restore habitat under Minnesota Statutes, section 103F.515, to protect, restore, and enhance habitat by expanding the riparian buffer program under the clean water fund for additional wildlife benefits from buffers on private land. Of this amount, up to $60,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (e) Accelerating the Wildlife Management Area Program, Phase 17 new text end new text begin $4,863,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Pheasants Forever to acquire in fee and restore and enhance lands for wildlife management area purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquisition of lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. new text end new text begin (f) Minnesota Prairie Recovery Program, Phase 14 new text end new text begin $2,433,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with The Nature Conservancy to acquire land in fee and restore and enhance native prairie, grasslands, wetlands, and savanna. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquiring lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. Annual income statements and balance sheets for income and expenses from land acquired with this appropriation must be submitted to the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council no later than 180 days following the close of The Nature Conservancy's fiscal year. A list of proposed land acquisitions, restorations, and enhancements must be provided as part of the required accomplishment plan and must be consistent with the priorities identified in Minnesota Prairie Conservation Plan. new text end new text begin (g) Northern Tallgrass Prairie National Wildlife Refuge, Phase 15 new text end new text begin $3,658,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with The Nature Conservancy, in cooperation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, to acquire land in fee or permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance lands in the Northern Tallgrass Prairie Habitat Preservation Area in western Minnesota for addition to the Northern Tallgrass Prairie National Wildlife Refuge. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquiring lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. new text end new text begin (h) DNR Wildlife Management Area and Scientific and Natural Area Acquisition, Phase 17 new text end new text begin $1,916,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to acquire in fee and restore and enhance lands for wildlife management purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8, and to acquire land in fee for scientific and natural area purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 5. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquisition of lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. new text end new text begin (i) Enhanced Public Land - Grasslands, Phase 8 new text end new text begin $3,440,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Pheasants Forever to enhance and restore grassland and wetland habitat on public lands in the forest prairie transition, metro urban, and prairie ecoregions of Minnesota. new text end new text begin (j) Accelerating the USFWS Habitat Conservation Easement Program, Phase 5 new text end new text begin $4,808,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to restore and enhance wetland and prairie habitat on habitat easements of the United States Fish and Wildlife Service as follows: $3,100,000 to Ducks Unlimited and $1,708,000 to Pheasants Forever. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Forests new text end new text begin 19,958,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Minnesota Forest Recovery Project, Phase 3 new text end new text begin $3,464,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with The Nature Conservancy in cooperation with the Department of Natural Resources and Minnesota Land Trust to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance degraded forests in Beltrami, Cass, Cook, Itasca, Lake, Koochiching, and St. Louis Counties. Of this amount, up to $84,000 is to the easement holder to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (b) Itasca County Memorial Forest Project new text end new text begin $2,720,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Itasca County to acquire priority forest habitat lands in fee as county forests. new text end new text begin (c) Hardwood Hills Habitat Conservation Program, Phase 2 new text end new text begin $1,803,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance forest habitats in the hardwood hills ecological section of west-central Minnesota as follows: $100,000 to St. John's University and $1,703,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Of the amount to Minnesota Land Trust, $196,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (d) Camp Ripley Sentinel Landscape Protection Program ACUB, Phase 13 new text end new text begin $2,183,000 the first year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources, in cooperation with the Morrison County Soil and Water Conservation District, to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance forest wildlife habitat within the boundaries of the Minnesota National Guard Camp Ripley Sentinel Landscape and Army Compatible Use Buffer. Of this amount, up to $110,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (e) Minnesota Forests for the Future, Phase 5 new text end new text begin $5,241,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to acquire lands in conservation easements and to restore and enhance forests, wetlands, and shoreline habitat through working forest permanent conservation easements under the Minnesota forests for the future program according to Minnesota Statutes, section 84.66. A conservation easement acquired with money appropriated under this paragraph must comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 13. The accomplishment plan must include an easement monitoring and enforcement plan. Of this amount, up to $400,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (f) DNR Forest Habitat Enhancement, Phase 5 new text end new text begin $2,543,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to restore and enhance forest wildlife habitats on public lands throughout Minnesota. new text end new text begin (g) Moose Habitat Collaborative - Northeast Minnesota Forest Habitat Enhancement, Phase 5 new text end new text begin $2,004,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Ruffed Grouse Society to restore and enhance public forest lands in the northern forest region for moose habitat purposes. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Wetlands new text end new text begin 29,032,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Wetland Habitat Protection and Restoration Program, Phase 10 new text end new text begin $2,853,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Land Trust to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance prairie, wetland, and other habitats on permanently protected conservation easements in high-priority wetland habitat complexes in the prairie, forest/prairie transition, and forest ecoregions. Of this amount, up to $168,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (b) Shallow Lake and Wetland Protection and Restoration Program, Phase 14 new text end new text begin $5,673,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Ducks Unlimited to acquire land in fee for wildlife management purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8, or to be designated and managed as waterfowl production areas or national wildlife refuges in Minnesota, in cooperation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, and to restore and enhance prairie lands, wetlands, and land-buffering shallow lakes. new text end new text begin (c) RIM Wetlands - Restoring the Most Productive Habitat in Minnesota, Phase 14 new text end new text begin $4,291,000 the first year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore wetlands and native grassland habitat under Minnesota Statutes, section 103F.515. Of this amount, up to $70,000 is for establishing a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (d) Accelerating the Waterfowl Production Area Acquisition Program, Phase 17 new text end new text begin $5,121,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Pheasants Forever, in cooperation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, to acquire land in fee and to restore and enhance wetlands and grasslands to be designated and managed as waterfowl production areas in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (e) Nelson Slough - East Park Wildlife Management Area, Phase 2 new text end new text begin $1,543,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Middle-Snake-Tamarac Rivers Watershed District to restore and enhance wetland and upland wildlife habitat in Nelson Slough and the East Park Wildlife Management Area in Marshall County. new text end new text begin (f) Living Shallow Lakes and Wetlands Enhancement and Restoration Initiative, Phase 11 new text end new text begin $5,601,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Ducks Unlimited to restore and enhance shallow lakes and wetlands on public lands and wetlands under permanent conservation easement for wildlife management. new text end new text begin (g) Big Swamp North new text end new text begin $1,442,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Roseau River Watershed District to restore and enhance wetland, stream, and other related wildlife habitat on public lands in the Big Swamp area in Roseau County. new text end new text begin (h) DNR Accelerated Shallow Lakes and Wetland Enhancement, Phase 17 new text end new text begin $2,508,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to enhance and restore shallow lakes and wetland habitat statewide. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Habitats new text end new text begin 77,646,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Cannon River Watershed Habitat Restoration and Protection Program, Phase 14 new text end new text begin $2,663,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat in the Cannon River Watershed as follows: $62,000 to Clean River Partners; $1,198,000 to Great River Greening; and $1,403,000 to the Trust for Public Land. new text end new text begin (b) Spring Road Conservation Project new text end new text begin $1,982,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Riley Purgatory Bluff Creek Watershed District to acquire priority wildlife habitat lands in fee in Hennepin County. new text end new text begin (c) Anoka Sand Plain Habitat Conservation, Phase 10 new text end new text begin $3,518,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat on public lands and easements in the Anoka Sand Plain ecoregion and intersecting minor watersheds as follows: $553,000 to Anoka Conservation District; $1,385,000 to Great River Greening; $300,000 to The Nature Conservancy; and $1,280,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $112,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (d) Integrating Habitat and Clean Water, Phase 3 new text end new text begin $2,691,000 the first year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources to acquire permanent conservation easements and restore and enhance wildlife habitat identified in One Watershed, One Plan for stacked benefit to wildlife and clean water. Of this amount, up to $80,000 is for establishing a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (e) St. Croix Watershed Habitat Protection and Restoration, Phase 6 new text end new text begin $3,184,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance natural habitat systems in the St. Croix River Watershed as follows: $1,199,000 to the Trust for Public Land; $121,000 to Wild Rivers Conservancy; and $1,864,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $168,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (f) Mississippi Headwaters Habitat Corridor Project, Phase 9 new text end new text begin $2,769,000 the first year is to acquire lands in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore wildlife habitat in the Mississippi headwaters. Of this amount: (1) $1,769,000 is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements as follows: $60,000 to the Mississippi Headwaters Board and $1,709,000 to the Trust for Public Land; and (2) $1,000,000 is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources, of which up to $50,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (g) Southeast Minnesota Protection and Restoration, Phase 13 new text end new text begin $2,334,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Land Trust to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat on public lands and permanent conservation easements in southeast Minnesota. Of this amount, up to $140,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (h) Protecting Coldwater Fisheries on Minnesota's North Shore, Phase 3 new text end new text begin $2,187,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Land Trust to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat in priority coldwater tributaries to Lake Superior. Of this amount, up to $196,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (i) Metro Big Rivers, Phase 15 new text end new text begin $6,793,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance natural habitat systems associated with the Mississippi, Minnesota, and St. Croix Rivers and their tributaries in the metropolitan area as follows: $1,000,000 to Minnesota Valley National Wildlife Refuge Trust, Inc.; $488,000 to Friends of the Mississippi River; $975,000 to Great River Greening; $2,151,000 to the Trust for Public Land; and $2,179,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $168,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (j) Minnesota River Watershed Habitat Conservation Program new text end new text begin $3,078,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance priority habitat in the Minnesota River watershed as follows: $1,364,000 to Great River Greening and $1,714,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $168,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (k) Shell Rock River Watershed Habitat Restoration Program, Phase 14 new text end new text begin $2,141,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Shell Rock River Watershed District to acquire land in fee and to restore and enhance habitat in the Shell Rock River watershed. new text end new text begin (l) Protecting Minnesota's Lakes of Outstanding Biological Significance, Phase 4 new text end new text begin $3,137,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance lakes of outstanding biological significance in northeast and north-central Minnesota. Of this amount, $1,494,000 is to the Northern Waters Land Trust and $1,643,000 is to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $168,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is for establishing a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (m) Shakopee Creek: Headwaters Restored, Species and Land Protected new text end new text begin $2,359,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Kandiyohi Soil and Water Conservation District to restore and enhance wildlife habitat in the headwaters area of Shakopee Creek in Kandiyohi County. new text end new text begin (n) DNR Trout Stream Conservation Easements, Phase 4 new text end new text begin $973,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to acquire land in permanent conservation easements to protect trout-stream aquatic habitat. Of this amount, up to $120,000 is for establishing a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (o) Fisheries Habitat Protection on Strategic North-Central Minnesota Lakes, Phase 11 new text end new text begin $2,878,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat to sustain healthy fish habitat on coldwater lakes in Aitkin, Cass, Crow Wing, and Hubbard Counties as follows: $1,259,000 to Northern Waters Land Trust and $1,619,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $168,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (p) Minnesota Statewide Trout Habitat Enhancement, Phase 2 new text end new text begin $2,124,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Trout Unlimited to restore and enhance habitat for trout and other species in and along coldwater rivers, lakes, and streams throughout Minnesota. new text end new text begin (q) Restoring and Enhancing Minnesota's Important Bird Areas, Phase 4 new text end new text begin $2,003,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Audubon Minnesota to restore and enhance wildlife habitat in important bird areas or Minnesota Prairie Conservation Plan Priority areas of northwestern Minnesota. new text end new text begin (r) Fall River Restoration new text end new text begin $1,318,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Cook County to restore and enhance coldwater stream habitat in the Fall River in Cook County. new text end new text begin (s) DNR Aquatic Habitat Restoration and Enhancement, Phase 8 new text end new text begin $3,800,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to restore and enhance aquatic habitat in degraded streams and aquatic management areas and to facilitate fish passage throughout Minnesota. new text end new text begin (t) Rum River Corridor Fish and Wildlife Habitat Enhancement, Phase 3 new text end new text begin $1,356,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Anoka County Soil and Water Conservation District to restore and enhance upland and riverine habitat in the Rum River corridor. new text end new text begin (u) DNR Roving Crew, Phase 3 new text end new text begin $12,642,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to restore and enhance fish and wildlife habitat on permanently protected lands throughout Minnesota using the roving crew program of the Department of Natural Resources. new text end new text begin (v) Conservation Partners Legacy Grant Program: Statewide and Metro Habitat, Phase 17 new text end new text begin $11,716,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for a program to provide competitive matching grants of up to $500,000 to local, regional, state, and national organizations for enhancing, restoring, or protecting forests, wetlands, prairies, or habitat for fish, game, or wildlife in Minnesota. Of this amount, unless not enough eligible grant applications are received, at least $3,000,000 is for grants in the seven-county metropolitan area and cities with a population of 50,000 or more and at least $2,620,000 is for grants to applicants that have not previously applied for money from the outdoor heritage fund. Grants must not be made for activities required to fulfill the duties of owners of lands subject to conservation easements. Grants must not be made from the appropriation in this paragraph for projects that have a total project cost exceeding $1,000,000. Of the total appropriation, $600,000 may be spent for personnel costs, outreach, and support to first-time applicants and other direct and necessary administrative costs. Grantees may acquire land or interests in land. Easements must be permanent. Grants may not be used to establish easement stewardship accounts. The program must require a match of at least ten percent from nonstate sources for all grants. The match may be cash or in-kind. For grant applications of $25,000 or less, the commissioner must provide a separate, simplified application process. Subject to Minnesota Statutes, the commissioner of natural resources must, when evaluating projects of equal value, give priority to organizations that have a history of receiving, or a charter to receive, private contributions for local conservation or habitat projects. All restoration or enhancement projects must be on land permanently protected by a permanent covenant ensuring perpetual maintenance and protection of restored and enhanced habitat, by a conservation easement, or by public ownership or in public waters as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 103G.005, subdivision 15. Priority must be given to restoration and enhancement projects on public lands. Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 13, applies to grants awarded under this paragraph. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. No less than five percent of the amount of each grant must be held back from reimbursement until the grant recipient completes a grant accomplishment report by the deadline and in the form prescribed by and satisfactory to the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council. The commissioner must provide notice of the grant program in the summary of game and fish law prepared under Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.051, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Administration new text end new text begin 2,043,000 new text end new text begin 775,000 new text end new text begin (a) Contract Management new text end new text begin $410,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for contract management duties assigned in this section. The commissioner must provide an accomplishment plan in the form specified by the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council on expending this appropriation. The accomplishment plan must include a copy of the grant contract template and reimbursement manual. No money may be expended before the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council approves the accomplishment plan. Money appropriated in this paragraph is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) Legislative Coordinating Commission new text end new text begin $732,000 the first year and $772,000 the second year are to the Legislative Coordinating Commission for administrative expenses of the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council and for compensating and reimbursing expenses of council members. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.281, applies to this appropriation. new text end new text begin (c) Technical Evaluation Panel new text end new text begin $157,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for a technical evaluation panel to conduct up to 20 restoration and enhancement evaluations under Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 10. Money appropriated in this paragraph is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (d) Core Functions in Partner-Led OHF Land Acquisitions new text end new text begin $740,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for administering the initial development, restoration, and enhancement of land acquired in fee with money appropriated from the outdoor heritage fund. This appropriation may be used for land acquisition costs incurred by the department as part of conveyance of parcels to the Department of Natural Resources and initial development activities on fee title acquisitions. Money appropriated in this paragraph is available until June 30, 2033. new text end new text begin (e) Legacy Website new text end new text begin $4,000 the first year and $3,000 the second year are to the Legislative Coordinating Commission for the website required under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.303, subdivision 10. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Availability of Appropriation new text end new text begin (a) Money appropriated in this section may not be spent on activities unless they are directly related to and necessary for a specific appropriation and are specified in the accomplishment plan approved by the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council. Money appropriated in this section must not be spent on indirect costs or other institutional overhead charges that are not directly related to and necessary for a specific appropriation. Money appropriated for fee title acquisition of land may be used to restore, enhance, and provide for public use of the land acquired with the appropriation. Public-use facilities must have a minimal impact on habitat in acquired lands. new text end new text begin (b) Money appropriated in this section is available as follows: new text end new text begin (1) money appropriated for acquiring real property is available until June 30, 2029; new text end new text begin (2) money appropriated for restoring and enhancing land acquired with an appropriation in this article is available for four years after the acquisition date with a maximum end date of June 30, 2033; new text end new text begin (3) money appropriated for restoring and enhancing other land is available until June 30, 2030; new text end new text begin (4) notwithstanding clauses (1) to (3), money appropriated for a project that receives at least 15 percent of its funding from federal funds is available until a date sufficient to match the availability of federal funding to a maximum of six years if the federal funding was confirmed and included in the original approved draft accomplishment plan; and new text end new text begin (5) money appropriated for other projects is available until the end of the fiscal year in which it is appropriated. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Payment Conditions and Capital Equipment Expenditures new text end new text begin (a) All agreements referred to in this section must be administered on a reimbursement basis unless otherwise provided in this section. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.41, expenditures directly related to each appropriation's purpose made on or after July 1, 2025, or the date of accomplishment plan approval, whichever is later, are eligible for reimbursement unless otherwise provided in this section. For the purposes of administering appropriations and legislatively authorized agreements paid out of the outdoor heritage fund, an expense must be considered reimbursable by the administering agency when the recipient presents the agency with an invoice or binding agreement with the landowner and the recipient attests that the goods have been received or the landowner agreement is binding. Periodic reimbursement must be made upon receiving documentation that the items articulated in the accomplishment plan approved by the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council have been achieved, including partial achievements as evidenced by progress reports approved by the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council. Reasonable amounts may be advanced to projects to accommodate cash flow needs, support future management of acquired lands, or match a federal share. The advances must be approved as part of the accomplishment plan. Capital equipment expenditures for specific items in excess of $10,000 must be itemized in and approved as part of the accomplishment plan. new text end new text begin (b) Unless otherwise provided, no money appropriated from the outdoor heritage fund in this article may be used to acquire, restore, or enhance any real property unless the specific acquisition, restoration, or enhancement is approved as part of the accomplishment plan on the parcel list. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Mapping new text end new text begin Each direct recipient of money appropriated in this section, as well as each recipient of a grant awarded under this section, must provide geographic information to the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council for mapping of any lands acquired in fee with funds appropriated in this section and open to the public taking of fish and game. The commissioner of natural resources must include the lands acquired in fee with money appropriated in this section on maps showing public recreation opportunities. Maps must include information on and acknowledgment of the outdoor heritage fund, including a notation of any restrictions. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Carryforward new text end new text begin (a) The availability of the appropriation for Laws 2020, chapter 104, article 1, section 2, subdivision 5, paragraph (b), Metro Big Rivers - Phase X, is extended to June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) The availability of the appropriation for Laws 2020, chapter 104, article 1, section 2, subdivision 5, paragraph (k), St. Louis River Restoration Initiative - Phase VII, is extended to June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) The availability of the appropriation for Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 1, section 2, subdivision 6, paragraph (d), Core Functions in Partner-Led OHF Land Acquisitions, is extended to June 30, 2031. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Cancellation new text end new text begin $120,000 of the outdoor heritage fund appropriation in Laws 2020, chapter 104, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, paragraph (i), is canceled no later than June 29, 2025. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 11 is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.056, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Accomplishment plans. new text begin (a) new text end It is a condition of acceptance of money appropriated from the outdoor heritage fund that the agency or entity using the appropriation submits an accomplishment plan and periodic accomplishment reports to the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council in the form determined by the council. The accomplishment plan must identify the project manager responsible for expending the appropriation and the final product. The accomplishment plan must account for the use of the appropriation and outcomes of the expenditure in measures of wetlands, prairies, forests, and fish, game, and wildlife habitat restored, protected, and enhanced. The plan must include an evaluation of results. If lands are acquired by fee with money from the outdoor heritage fund, the accomplishment plan must include a hunting and fishing management plan for the lands acquired by fee. No money appropriated from the outdoor heritage fund may be expended unless the council has approved the pertinent accomplishment plan. new text begin (b) If an appropriation from the outdoor heritage fund will result in or contribute to restoration or enhancement habitat work on land, it is a condition of acceptance of the money that the recipient include the following in the accomplishment plan: new text end new text begin (1) an agreement that the recipient of the appropriation will notify all adjacent property owners by certified mail of the work to be performed. The notice must include the name, phone number, and email of the project manager or local contact so that adjacent property owners can contact the person with questions about the project. A copy of the notification letter must be attached to the accomplishment plan; and new text end new text begin (2) an explanation of how the recipient will seek approval from adjacent property owners if access to adjacent land is required to perform the work. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to appropriations from the outdoor heritage fund on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.056, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 25. new text end new text begin Federal grant fund requirements. new text end new text begin An interest in real property acquired with money appropriated from the outdoor heritage fund may be used to leverage federal grant funds for related conservation programs, such as Pittman-Robertson Wildlife Restoration, United States Code, title 16, section 669 et seq.; Dingell-Johnson Sport Fish Restoration, United States Code, title 16, section 777 et seq.; and the North American Wetlands Conservation Act, United States Code, title 16, section 4401. These grant programs may place conditions on land use that require the continued use of the land for conservation purposes. Placement of conditions on land use under these programs does not require prior review and approval of the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council or its successor under subdivision 15, paragraph (b). new text end ARTICLE 2 CLEAN WATER FUND Section 1. new text begin CLEAN WATER FUND APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the clean water fund and are available for the fiscal years indicated for allowable activities under the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, section 15. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under the figure are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. These are onetime appropriations. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin CLEAN WATER FUNDnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 144,625,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 159,301,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is from the clean water fund. The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following sections. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Availability of Appropriation new text end new text begin Money appropriated in this article may not be spent on activities unless they are directly related to and necessary for a specific appropriation. Money appropriated in this article must be spent in accordance with Minnesota Management and Budget MMB Guidance to Agencies on Legacy Fund Expenditure. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, and unless otherwise specified in this article, fiscal year 2026 appropriations are available until June 30, 2027, and fiscal year 2027 appropriations are available until June 30, 2028. If a project receives federal funds, the period of the appropriation is extended to equal the availability of federal funding. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Disability Access new text end new text begin Where appropriate, grant recipients of clean water funds, in consultation with the Council on Disability and other appropriate governor-appointed disability councils, boards, committees, and commissions, should make progress toward providing people with disabilities greater access to programs, print publications, and digital media related to the programs the recipient funds using appropriations made in this article. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Increasing Diversity in Environmental Careers new text end new text begin Agencies should work to provide opportunities that encourage a diversity of students to pursue careers in environment and natural resources when implementing appropriations in this article. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 16,075,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 17,275,000 new text end new text begin (a) $370,000 the first year and $370,000 the second year are to increase monitoring for pesticides and pesticide degradates in surface water and groundwater and to use data collected to assess pesticide use practices. new text end new text begin (b) $3,100,000 the first year and $3,100,000 the second year are for monitoring and evaluating trends in the concentration of nitrate in groundwater; promoting, developing, and evaluating regional and crop-specific nutrient best management practices, cover crops, and other vegetative cover; assessing adoption of best management practices and other recommended practices; education and technical support from University of Minnesota Extension; grants to support agricultural demonstration and implementation activities, including research activities at the Rosholt Research Farm; and other actions to protect groundwater from degradation from nitrate. new text end new text begin (c) $2,000,000 the first year and $2,000,000 the second year are for the agriculture best management practices loan program. Any unencumbered balance at the end of the second year must be added to the corpus of the loan fund. new text end new text begin (d) $1,600,000 the first year and $1,600,000 the second year are for technical assistance; research, demonstration, and promotion projects on properly implementing best management practices and vegetative cover; and more-precise information on nonpoint contributions to impaired waters and for grants to support on-farm demonstration of agricultural practices. new text end new text begin (e) $50,000 the first year and $50,000 the second year are for maintenance of the Minnesota Water Research Digital Library. Costs for information technology development or support for the digital library may be paid to Minnesota IT Services. new text end new text begin (f) $3,500,000 the first year and $3,500,000 the second year are to implement the Minnesota agricultural water quality certification program statewide. new text end new text begin (g) $155,000 the first year and $155,000 the second year are for a regional irrigation water quality specialist through University of Minnesota Extension. new text end new text begin (h) $2,000,000 the first year and $3,000,000 the second year are for grants to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to fund the Forever Green initiative and to protect the state's natural resources while increasing the efficiency, profitability, and productivity of Minnesota farmers by incorporating perennial and winter-annual crops into existing agricultural practices. new text end new text begin (i) $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are for testing drinking-water wells for pesticides. new text end new text begin (j) $1,750,000 the first year and $1,750,000 the second year are for conservation equipment assistance grants to purchase equipment or items to retrofit existing equipment that has climate and water quality benefits. new text end new text begin (k) $1,050,000 the first year and $1,250,000 the second year are for expanding the existing state weather station and soil temperature network to provide accurate and timely weather data to optimize the timing of irrigation, fertilizer, pesticide, and manure applications and support land management decisions. new text end new text begin (l) Unless otherwise specified, the appropriations in this section are available until June 30, 2030. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin POLLUTION CONTROL AGENCYnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 24,501,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 24,702,000 new text end new text begin (a) $9,450,000 the first year and $9,450,000 the second year are for completing needed statewide assessments of surface water quality and trends according to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 114D. Of this amount, $170,000 the first year and $170,000 the second year are for grants to the Red River Watershed Management Board to enhance and expand the existing water quality and watershed monitoring river watch activities in schools in the Red River of the North Watershed. By February 15, 2028, the Red River Watershed Management Board must provide a report to the commissioner and the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources finance and policy and the clean water fund on the expenditure of this appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) $7,250,000 the first year and $7,250,000 the second year are to support public participation in the watershed approach and to update watershed restoration and protection strategies, which include total maximum daily load (TMDL) and other supporting studies according to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 114D, for waters on the impaired waters list approved by the United States Environmental Protection Agency. new text end new text begin (c) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are for groundwater assessment, including enhancing the ambient monitoring network, modeling, and evaluating trends. new text end new text begin (d) $1,600,000 the first year and $1,600,000 the second year are for national pollutant discharge elimination system wastewater and stormwater TMDL implementation efforts. new text end new text begin (e) $3,340,000 the first year and $3,541,000 the second year are for enhancing the county-level delivery systems for subsurface sewage treatment system (SSTS) activities necessary to implement Minnesota Statutes, sections 115.55 and 115.56, for protecting groundwater. This appropriation includes base grants for all counties with SSTS programs. Counties that receive base grants must report the number of properties with noncompliant systems upgraded through an SSTS replacement, connection to a centralized sewer system, or other means, including property abandonment or buyout. Counties also must report the number of existing SSTS compliance inspections conducted in areas under county jurisdiction. The required reports must be part of the established annual reporting for SSTS programs. Of this amount, at least $900,000 each year is available to counties for grants to low-income landowners to address systems that pose an imminent threat to public health or safety or fail to protect groundwater. A county receiving a grant under this paragraph must submit a report to the agency listing the projects funded, including an account of the expenditures. new text end new text begin (f) $650,000 the first year and $650,000 the second year are for activities and grants that reduce chloride pollution. new text end new text begin (g) $461,000 the first year and $461,000 the second year are to support activities of the Clean Water Council according to Minnesota Statutes, section 114D.30, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (h) $750,000 the first year and $750,000 the second year are for a grant program for sanitary sewer projects that are included in the draft or any updated Voyageurs National Park Clean Water Project Comprehensive Plan to restore the water quality of waters in Voyageurs National Park. Grants must be awarded to local government units for projects approved by the Voyageurs National Park Clean Water Joint Powers Board and must be matched by at least 25 percent from sources other than the clean water fund. new text end new text begin (i) Any unencumbered grant balances in the first year do not cancel but are available for grants in the second year. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the appropriations in this section are available until June 30, 2030. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 14,150,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 14,650,000 new text end new text begin (a) $2,825,000 the first year and $2,825,000 the second year are for stream flow monitoring. new text end new text begin (b) $1,525,000 the first year and $1,525,000 the second year are for lake Index of Biological Integrity (IBI) assessments. new text end new text begin (c) $550,000 the first year and $550,000 the second year are for assessing mercury and other fish contaminants, including PFAS compounds, and monitoring to track the status of impaired waters over time. new text end new text begin (d) $2,250,000 the first year and $2,500,000 the second year are for developing targeted, science-based watershed restoration and protection strategies and for technical assistance for local governments. new text end new text begin (e) $2,350,000 the first year and $2,350,000 the second year are for water-supply planning, aquifer protection, and monitoring activities and analysis. new text end new text begin (f) $2,100,000 the first year and $2,250,000 the second year are for technical assistance to support local implementation of nonpoint source restoration and protection activities and targeted forest stewardship for water quality. new text end new text begin (g) $700,000 the first year and $700,000 the second year are for tool development and evaluation, including maintaining and updating spatial data for watershed boundaries, streams, and water bodies and integrating high-resolution digital elevation data and for assessing the effectiveness of forestry best management practices for water quality. new text end new text begin (h) $100,000 the first year and $100,000 the second year are for accelerating completion of or updates to county geologic atlases and supplementing water chemistry or chemical movement studies. new text end new text begin (i) $350,000 the first year and $350,000 the second year are for increasing native freshwater mussel production capacity and restoring and monitoring freshwater mussel restoration efforts. new text end new text begin (j) $1,400,000 the first year and $1,500,000 the second year are for providing technical and financial assistance for county and local governments to replace failing or ineffective culverts using modern designs that restore floodplain connectivity, biological connectivity, and channel stability. This appropriation is available for up to two additional years. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin BOARD OF WATER AND SOIL RESOURCESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 64,332,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 75,004,000 new text end new text begin (a) $39,962,000 the first year and $48,138,000 the second year are for agreements to implement state-approved watershed-based plans. The agreements may be used to implement projects or programs that protect, enhance, and restore surface water quality in lakes, rivers, and streams; protect groundwater from degradation; and protect drinking water sources. Activities must be identified in a comprehensive watershed plan developed under the One Watershed, One Plan program and seven-county metropolitan groundwater or surface water management frameworks as provided for in Minnesota Statutes, chapters 103B, 103C, 103D, and 114D. Other legacy funds may be used to supplement projects funded under this paragraph. This appropriation may be used for: new text end new text begin (1) implementing state-approved plans, including within the following watershed planning areas: Big Fork River, Blue Earth River, Bois de Sioux - Mustinka, Buffalo-Red River, Cannon River, Cedar - Wapsipinicon, Chippewa River, Clearwater River, Cottonwood-Middle Minnesota, Crow Wing River, Des Moines River, Greater Zumbro River, Hawk Creek - Middle Minnesota, Kettle and Upper St. Croix, Lac qui Parle-Yellow Bank, Lake of the Woods, Lake Superior North, Le Sueur River, Leech Lake River, Little Fork River, Long Prairie River, Lower Minnesota River East, Lower Minnesota River West, Lower St. Croix River, Middle-Snake-Tamarac Rivers, Minnesota River-Mankato, Mississippi River Brainerd, Mississippi River Headwaters, Mississippi River St. Cloud, Mississippi River-Sartell, Mississippi River Winona/La Crescent, Missouri River Basin, Nemadji River, North Fork Crow River, Otter Tail, Pine River, Pomme de Terre River, Rainy-Rapid River, Rainy Headwaters - Vermilion, Rainy River-Rainy Lake, Red Lake River, Redeye River, Redwood River, Root River, Roseau River, Rum River, Sand Hill River, Sauk River, Shell Rock and Winnebago River, Snake River, South Fork of the Crow River, St. Louis River, Thief River, Two Rivers Plus, Upper and Lower Red Lake, Upper Minnesota River, Upper Mississippi - Grand Rapids, Watonwan River, Wild Rice - Marsh, and Yellow Medicine River; new text end new text begin (2) implementing seven-county metropolitan groundwater or surface water management frameworks; and new text end new text begin (3) implementing other comprehensive watershed management plan planning areas that have a board-approved and local-government-adopted plan as authorized in Minnesota Statutes, section 103B.801. new text end new text begin The board must establish eligibility criteria and determine whether a planning area is ready to proceed. new text end new text begin (b) $2,935,000 the first year and $3,065,000 the second year are for agreements with local government units to protect and restore surface water and drinking water; to keep water on the land; to protect, enhance, and restore water quality in lakes, rivers, and streams; and to protect groundwater and drinking water, including feedlot water quality and subsurface sewage treatment system projects and stream bank, stream channel, shoreline restoration, and ravine stabilization projects. The projects must use practices demonstrated to be effective, be of long-lasting public benefit, include a match, and be consistent with total maximum daily load (TMDL) implementation plans, watershed restoration and protection strategies (WRAPS), groundwater restoration and protection strategies (GRAPS), or local water management plans or their equivalents. Up to 50 percent of this appropriation is available for land-treatment projects and practices that benefit drinking water. new text end new text begin (c) $4,350,000 the first year and $4,350,000 the second year are for accelerated implementation, local resource protection, statewide analytical targeting or technology tools that fill an identified gap, program enhancements for technical assistance, citizen and community outreach, compliance, and training and certification. new text end new text begin (d) $1,250,000 the first year and $1,250,000 the second year are: new text end new text begin (1) to provide state oversight and accountability, evaluate and communicate results, provide implementation tools, and measure the value of conservation program implementation by local governments; and new text end new text begin (2) to submit to the legislature by December 15 each even-numbered year a biennial report detailing the recipients and projects funded and the results accomplished under this section. new text end new text begin (e) $2,000,000 the first year and $2,000,000 the second year are to provide assistance, oversight, and support for local governments in implementing and complying with riparian protection and excessive soil loss requirements. new text end new text begin (f) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are for a working lands floodplain program and to purchase, restore, or preserve riparian land and floodplains adjacent to lakes, wetlands, rivers, streams, and tributaries, by conservation easements or other agreements to keep water on the land, to decrease sediment, pollutant, and nutrient transport; reduce hydrologic impacts to surface waters; and increase protection and recharge for groundwater. Up to $60,000 is for deposit in a conservation easement stewardship account established according to Minnesota Statutes, section 103B.103. new text end new text begin (g) $2,500,000 the first year and $2,500,000 the second year are for conservation easements under Minnesota Statutes, section 103F.501 to 103F.535, or for agreements with local units of government or Tribal governments for long-term protection of groundwater supply sources. Priority must be placed on drinking water supply management areas where the vulnerability of the drinking water supply is designated as high or very high by the commissioner of health, that are mitigation level 1 or 2 under the groundwater protection rule, where drinking water protection plans developed by Tribal governments have identified high vulnerability, or where drinking water protection plans have identified specific activities that will achieve long-term protection. Up to $200,000 is for deposit in a conservation easement stewardship account established according to Minnesota Statutes, section 103B.103. new text end new text begin (h) $100,000 the first year and $100,000 the second year are for a technical evaluation panel to conduct restoration evaluations under Minnesota Statutes, section 114D.50, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (i) $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are for assistance to, oversight of, and agreements with local governments to enhance and update comprehensive watershed management plans developed under Minnesota Statutes, section 103B.801. new text end new text begin (j) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are for technical and financial assistance for the conservation drainage program, in consultation with the Drainage Work Group, coordinated under Minnesota Statutes, section 103B.101, subdivision 13, and including projects to improve multipurpose water management under Minnesota Statutes, section 103E.015. new text end new text begin (k) $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are to purchase permanent conservation easements to protect lands adjacent to public waters that have good water quality but that are threatened with degradation. Up to $60,000 is for deposit in a conservation easement stewardship account established according to Minnesota Statutes, section 103B.103. new text end new text begin (l) $425,000 the first year and $425,000 the second year are to systematically collect data and produce county, watershed, and statewide estimates of soil erosion caused by water and wind, and track adoption of conservation measures, including cover crops, to address erosion. This appropriation may be used for agreements with the University of Minnesota to complete this work. new text end new text begin (m) $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are for implementing a water legacy program to expand partnerships for clean water. new text end new text begin (n) $2,500,000 the first year and $2,500,000 the second year are for permanent conservation easements to protect and restore wetlands and associated uplands. Up to $100,000 is for deposit in a conservation easement stewardship account established according to Minnesota Statutes, section 103B.103. new text end new text begin (o) $3,560,000 the first year and $5,926,000 the second year are for financial and technical assistance to enhance adoption of cover crops and other soil health practices to achieve water quality or drinking water benefits. The board may use agreements with local governments, the United States Department of Agriculture, AgCentric at Minnesota State Center for Excellence, and other practitioners and partners to accomplish this work. Up to $450,000 is for an agreement with the University of Minnesota Office for Soil Health for applied research and education on Minnesota's agroecosystems and soil health management systems. This appropriation may be extended to leverage available federal funds. new text end new text begin (p) $750,000 the first year and $750,000 the second year are to contract for delivery of services with Conservation Corps Minnesota and Iowa for restoration, maintenance, training, and other activities consistent with this section. new text end new text begin (q) $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are to provide support to soil and water conservation districts and other local governments and partner organizations in the Lake Superior basin to leverage Great Lakes Restoration Initiative or other federal funding to implement prioritized activities. new text end new text begin (r) The board may shift funds in this section and may adjust the technical and administrative assistance portion of the funds to leverage federal or other nonstate funds, to facilitate oversight responsibilities, or to address high-priority activities identified by the board consistent with local water management plans. new text end new text begin (s) The board must require grantees to specify the outcomes that will be achieved by the grants. new text end new text begin (t) The appropriations in this section are available until June 30, 2030, except grant or easement funds are available for five years after the date a grant or other agreement is executed. Returned funds must be repurposed consistent with the purposes of this section. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 14,295,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 15,845,000 new text end new text begin (a) $5,925,000 the first year and $5,925,000 the second year are to develop health risk limits and other health-based guidance and conduct outreach activities for contaminants found or anticipated to be found in Minnesota drinking water; to accredit private laboratories to conduct analyses for these contaminants; and to increase the capacity of the department's laboratory to analyze for these contaminants. new text end new text begin (b) $2,300,000 the first year and $3,700,000 the second year are for ensuring safe drinking water for private well users in southeast Minnesota and statewide by designing and implementing voluntary interventions to reduce health risks to private well users, including identifying private well locations, studying the occurrence and magnitude of contaminants in private wells, developing guidance and conducting outreach and education about well testing and mitigation, awarding grants to local governments, and offering well testing. new text end new text begin (c) $3,770,000 the first year and $3,920,000 the second year are for protecting sources of drinking water, including planning, implementation, and monitoring activities and grants to local governments and public water systems. new text end new text begin (d) $1,750,000 the first year and $1,750,000 the second year are to develop and deliver groundwater restoration and protection strategies on a watershed scale for use in local comprehensive water planning efforts, to provide resources to local governments for activities that sustain groundwater and protect sources of drinking water, and to enhance approaches that improve the capacity of local governmental units to protect and restore groundwater resources. new text end new text begin (e) $250,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are to develop public health policies and approaches to address threats to safe drinking water, including implementation of a statewide action plan for protecting drinking water. new text end new text begin (f) $300,000 the first year and $300,000 the second year are for optimizing the statewide recreational water portal that includes an inventory of public beaches and information about local monitoring results and closures and that provides information about preventing illness and recreational water stewardship. new text end new text begin (g) Unless otherwise specified, the appropriations in this section are available until June 30, 2029. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin METROPOLITAN COUNCILnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,025,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,125,000 new text end new text begin (a) $1,375,000 the first year and $1,375,000 the second year are to support communities implementing projects that address emerging drinking water supply threats and overall water sustainability, provide cost-effective regional solutions, leverage interjurisdictional coordination, support local implementation of wellhead protection plans, and prevent degradation of groundwater and surface water resources. These activities will provide communities with: new text end new text begin (1) potential solutions to better connect land use impacts on water supply and overall water sustainability; new text end new text begin (2) ways to balance regional water use by using surface water, stormwater, wastewater, and groundwater; new text end new text begin (3) an analysis of infrastructure requirements needed to maintain and strengthen the reliability of water systems; new text end new text begin (4) development of planning-level cost estimates, including capital costs and operating costs; new text end new text begin (5) funding mechanisms and an equitable cost-sharing structure for regionally beneficial water supply development projects; new text end new text begin (6) information and tools to use to address climate change impacts on overall water supply systems and overall water sustainability; and new text end new text begin (7) ways to reduce impacts on the groundwater system through stormwater reuse grants to assist communities in reducing water use. new text end new text begin (b) $650,000 the first year and $750,000 the second year are for grants that implement water demand reduction measures. The grants are to assist municipalities in the metropolitan area with implementing water demand reduction measures to ensure the reliability and protection of drinking water supplies. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin UNIVERSITY OF MINNESOTAnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,000,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,400,000 new text end new text begin (a) $400,000 the first year and $400,000 the second year are for developing Part A of county geologic atlases. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2030. new text end new text begin (b) $600,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are for a program to evaluate performance and technology transfer for stormwater best management practices, to evaluate best management performance and effectiveness to support meeting total maximum daily loads, to develop standards and incorporate state-of-the-art guidance using minimal impact design standards as the model, and to implement a system to transfer knowledge and technology across the local government, industry, and regulatory sectors. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2032. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin LEGISLATUREnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 7,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $7,000 the first year is for the Legislative Coordinating Commission for the website required under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.303, subdivision 10. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin PUBLIC FACILITIES AUTHORITYnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 8,240,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 8,300,000 new text end new text begin (a) $8,190,000 the first year and $8,250,000 the second year are for the point source implementation grants program under Minnesota Statutes, section 446A.073. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2032. new text end new text begin (b) $50,000 the first year and $50,000 the second year are for small community wastewater treatment grants and loans under Minnesota Statutes, section 446A.075. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2032. new text end new text begin (c) If there is any uncommitted money at the end of each fiscal year under paragraph (a) or (b), the Public Facilities Authority may transfer the remaining funds to eligible projects under any of the programs listed in this section according to a project's priority rank on the Pollution Control Agency's project priority list. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 114D.50, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Restoration and enhancement requirements. new text end new text begin If an appropriation from the clean water fund will result in or contribute to restoration or enhancement habitat work on land, it is a condition of acceptance of the money that the recipient of the appropriation agree that the recipient will notify all adjacent property owners by certified mail of the work to be performed and will seek approval from adjacent property owners if access to adjacent land is required to perform work. The notice must include the name, phone number, and email of the project manager or local contact so that adjacent property owners can contact the person with questions about the project. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to appropriations from the clean water fund on or after that date. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin ASH RIVER SANITARY SEWER COLLECTION AND TREATMENT SYSTEM APPROPRIATION EXTENSION.new text end new text begin The portion of the appropriation in Laws 2019, First Special Session chapter 2, article 2, section 5, paragraph (h), as amended by Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 2, section 18, for the Ash River Sanitary Sewer Collection and Treatment System is available until June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 3 PARKS AND TRAILS FUND Section 1. new text begin PARKS AND TRAILS FUND APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the parks and trails fund and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under the figure are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. These are onetime appropriations. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin PARKS AND TRAILS FUNDnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 61,435,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 68,733,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following sections. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Availability of Appropriation new text end new text begin Money appropriated in this article may not be spent on activities unless they are directly related to and necessary for a specific appropriation. Money appropriated in this article must be spent in accordance with Minnesota Management and Budget MMB Guidance to Agencies on Legacy Fund Expenditure. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, and unless otherwise specified in this article, fiscal year 2026 appropriations are available until June 30, 2028, and fiscal year 2027 appropriations are available until June 30, 2029. If a project receives federal funds, the period of the appropriation is extended to equal the availability of federal funding. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Disability Access new text end new text begin Where appropriate, grant recipients of parks and trails funds, in consultation with the Council on Disability and other appropriate governor-appointed disability councils, boards, committees, and commissions, should make progress toward providing people with disabilities greater access to programs, print publications, and digital media related to the programs the recipient funds using appropriations made in this article. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Energy and Water Conservation new text end new text begin Grant recipients of parks and trails funds should prioritize water and energy conservation technology and the use of renewable energy for construction and building projects funded with an appropriation made in this article. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 37,095,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 41,511,000 new text end new text begin (a) $24,295,000 the first year and $27,222,000 the second year are for state parks, recreation areas, and trails to: new text end new text begin (1) connect people to the outdoors; new text end new text begin (2) acquire land and create opportunities; new text end new text begin (3) maintain existing holdings; and new text end new text begin (4) improve cooperation by coordinating with partners to implement the 25-year long-range parks and trails legacy plan. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may spend money appropriated under paragraph (a) on I Can! programs, including but not limited to programs designed to provide underserved youth and youth who identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer the opportunity to experience the outdoors with similar peers. new text end new text begin (c) $12,148,000 the first year and $13,610,000 the second year are for grants for parks and trails of regional significance outside the seven-county metropolitan area under Minnesota Statutes, section 85.535. The grants awarded under this paragraph must be based on the lists of recommended projects submitted to the legislative committees under Minnesota Statutes, section 85.536, subdivision 10, from the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission established under Minnesota Statutes, section 85.536. Grants funded under this paragraph must support parks and trails of regional or statewide significance that meet the applicable definitions and criteria for regional parks and trails contained in the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Strategic Plan adopted by the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission on April 22, 2015. Grant recipients identified under this paragraph must submit a grant application to the commissioner of natural resources. Of the amount appropriated, up to $140,000 each year may be used by the commissioner for the actual cost of issuing and monitoring the grants for the commission. Of the amount appropriated, $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are for the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission to carry out its duties under Minnesota Statutes, section 85.536, including the continued development of a statewide system plan for regional parks and trails outside the seven-county metropolitan area. new text end new text begin (d) By January 15, 2026, the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission must submit a list of projects that contains the commission's recommendations for funding from the parks and trails fund for fiscal year 2027 to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources and the parks and trails fund. new text end new text begin (e) By January 15, 2026, the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission must submit a report that contains the commission's criteria for funding from the parks and trails fund, including the criteria used to determine if a park or trail is of regional significance, to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources and the parks and trails fund. new text end new text begin (f) $652,000 the first year and $679,000 the second year are for coordination and projects between the department, the Metropolitan Council, and the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission; enhanced web-based information for park and trail users; and support of activities of the Parks and Trails Legacy Advisory Committee. new text end new text begin (g) The commissioner must contract for services with Conservation Corps Minnesota and Iowa for restoration, maintenance, and other activities under this section for at least $850,000 the first year and $850,000 the second year. new text end new text begin (h) Grant recipients of an appropriation under this section must give consideration to contracting with Conservation Corps Minnesota and Iowa for restoration, maintenance, and other activities. new text end new text begin (i) In addition to the requirements under paragraph (g), the commissioner should work to provide other opportunities that encourage a diversity of students to pursue careers in environment and natural resources when implementing appropriations in this section. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin METROPOLITAN COUNCILnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 24,295,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 27,222,000 new text end new text begin (a) $24,295,000 the first year and $27,222,000 the second year are for distribution according to Minnesota Statutes, section 85.53, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (b) Money appropriated under this section and distributed to implementing agencies must be used only to fund the list of projects approved by the elected representatives of each of the metropolitan parks implementing agencies. Projects funded by the money appropriated under this section must be substantially consistent with the project descriptions and dollar amounts approved by each elected body. Any money remaining after completing the listed projects may be spent by the implementing agencies on projects to support parks and trails. new text end new text begin (c) Grant agreements entered into by the Metropolitan Council and recipients of money appropriated under this section must ensure that the money is used to supplement and not substitute for traditional sources of funding. new text end new text begin (d) The implementing agencies receiving appropriations under this section must give consideration to contracting with Conservation Corps Minnesota for restoration, maintenance, and other activities. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin LEGISLATIVEnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 4,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $4,000 the first year is for the Legislative Coordinating Commission for the website required under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.303, subdivision 10. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin ADDITIONAL FISCAL YEAR 2026 APPROPRIATION FOR GREATER MINNESOTA PARKS AND TRAILS.new text end new text begin $41,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the parks and trails fund to the commissioner of natural resources for grants for parks and trails of regional significance outside the seven-county metropolitan area. This appropriation is available June 30, 2028. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin PARKS AND TRAILS FUND APPROPRIATION EXTENSIONS.new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to Goodhue County for the Cannon Valley Trail project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2023 appropriation under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to Stearns County for the Beaver Island Trail project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2023 appropriation under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to the city of Winona for the Bluffs Traverse Trail project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2023 appropriation under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to the city of Austin for the Jay C. Hormel Nature Center project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2024 appropriation under Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 3, section 3, paragraph (c), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to the city of Duluth for the Spirit Mountain Recreation Area project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2023 appropriation under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to the city of Duluth for the Waabizheshikana/Marten Trail project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2024 appropriation under Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 3, section 3, paragraph (c), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin CANCELLATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) The unobligated balance from the parks and trails fund appropriation under Laws 2019, First Special Session, chapter 2, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), for grants estimated to be $10,000 is canceled to the parks and trails fund no later than June 30, 2025. new text end new text begin (b) The unobligated balance from the parks and trails fund appropriation under Laws 2021, First Special Session, chapter 1, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), for grants estimated to be $31,000 is canceled to the parks and trails fund no later than June 30, 2025. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 4 ARTS AND CULTURAL HERITAGE FUND Section 1. new text begin ARTS AND CULTURAL HERITAGE FUND APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the entities and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the arts and cultural heritage fund and are available for the fiscal years indicated for allowable activities under the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, section 15, except that any unencumbered balance remaining under this article from the first year does not cancel but is available in the second year. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under the figure are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. All appropriations in this article are onetime. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin ARTS AND CULTURAL HERITAGEnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 85,293,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 94,618,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Availability of Appropriation new text end new text begin Money appropriated in this article must not be spent on activities unless they are directly related to and necessary for a specific appropriation. Money appropriated in this article must not be spent on institutional overhead charges that are not directly related to and necessary for a specific appropriation. Money appropriated in this article must be spent in accordance with Minnesota Management and Budget MMB Guidance to Agencies on Legacy Fund Expenditure. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, and unless otherwise specified in this article, fiscal year 2026 appropriations are available until June 30, 2027, and fiscal year 2027 appropriations are available until June 30, 2028. Water and energy conservation technology and the use of renewable energy should be priorities for construction and building projects funded through this appropriation. If a project receives federal funds, the period of the appropriation is extended to equal the availability of federal funding. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin MINNESOTA STATE ARTS BOARDnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 40,088,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 44,470,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grant Agreements new text end new text begin The amounts in this section are appropriated to the Minnesota State Arts Board for arts, arts education, arts preservation, and arts access. Grant agreements entered into by the Minnesota State Arts Board and other recipients of appropriations in this section must ensure that the money is used to supplement and not substitute for traditional sources of funding. Each grant program established in this appropriation must be separately administered from other state appropriations for program planning and outcome measurements, but may take into consideration other state resources awarded in the selection of applicants and grant award size. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Arts and Arts Access Initiatives new text end new text begin 32,071,000 new text end new text begin 35,576,000 new text end new text begin $32,071,000 the first year and $35,576,000 the second year are to support Minnesota artists and arts organizations in creating, producing, and presenting high-quality arts activities; to preserve, maintain, and interpret art forms and works of art so that they are accessible to Minnesota audiences; to overcome barriers to accessing high-quality arts activities; and to instill the arts into the community and public life in this state. Grants provided under this subdivision must prioritize artists and arts organizations that plan to present art from communities that have been historically underrepresented in the arts or that improve access to the programs and projects for groups, including youth and historically underserved communities, that have struggled to access arts programming in the past. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Arts Education new text end new text begin 6,013,000 new text end new text begin 6,670,000 new text end new text begin $6,013,000 the first year and $6,670,000 the second year are for high-quality, age-appropriate arts education for Minnesotans of all ages to develop knowledge, skills, and understanding of the arts. Priority in the award of grants under this subdivision must be given to providing educational opportunities to underserved communities with grants for organizations or entities providing opportunities to K-12 students throughout the state for arts education, including access to arts instruction, arts programming, museums, and arts presentations. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Arts and Cultural Heritage new text end new text begin 2,004,000 new text end new text begin 2,224,000 new text end new text begin $2,004,000 the first year and $2,224,000 the second year are for events and activities that represent, preserve, and maintain the diverse cultural arts traditions, including folk and traditional artists and art organizations, represented in this state. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Administrative Costs new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, up to five percent of the totals in subdivisions 3 to 5 each year is for administering grant programs, delivering technical services, providing fiscal oversight for the statewide system, and ensuring accountability in fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Regional Arts Councils new text end new text begin Thirty percent of the remaining total appropriation to each of the categories listed in subdivisions 3 to 5 is for grants to the regional arts councils. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, regional arts council grants or other arts council grants for touring programs, projects, or exhibits must ensure the programs, projects, or exhibits are able to tour in their own region as well as all other regions of the state. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin MINNESOTA HISTORICAL SOCIETYnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 14,409,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 20,000,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grant Agreements new text end new text begin (a) The amounts in this section are appropriated to the governing board of the Minnesota Historical Society to preserve and enhance access to Minnesota's history and its cultural and historical resources. Grant agreements entered into by the Minnesota Historical Society and other recipients of appropriations in this section must ensure that the money is used to supplement and not substitute for traditional sources of funding. Money directly appropriated to the Minnesota Historical Society must be used to supplement and not substitute for traditional sources of funding. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, for historic preservation projects that improve historic structures, the amounts are available until June 30, 2029. The Minnesota Historical Society or grant recipients of the Minnesota Historical Society using money from the arts and cultural heritage fund under this section must give consideration to Conservation Corps Minnesota and Iowa and Northern Bedrock Historic Preservation Corps, or an organization carrying out similar work, for projects with the potential to need historic preservation services. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, up to five percent of the totals in subdivisions 3 and 4 each year is for administering grants and grant programs, delivering technical services, providing fiscal oversight, and ensuring accountability in fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Historical Grants and Programs new text end new text begin 14,284,000 new text end new text begin 19,875,000 new text end new text begin (a) Statewide Historic and Cultural Grants new text end new text begin $4,822,000 the first year and $7,640,000 the second year are for statewide historic and cultural grants to local, county, regional, or other historical or cultural organizations or for activities to preserve significant historic and cultural resources. Money must be distributed through a competitive grant process. The Minnesota Historical Society must administer the money using established grant mechanisms with assistance from the advisory committee created under Laws 2009, chapter 172, article 4, section 2, subdivision 4, paragraph (b), item (ii). new text end new text begin (b) Statewide History Programs new text end new text begin $4,940,000 the first year and $7,640,000 the second year are for historic and cultural programs and purposes related to the heritage of the state. new text end new text begin (c) History Partnerships new text end new text begin $1,812,000 the first year and $2,935,000 the second year are for history partnerships involving multiple organizations, which may include the Minnesota Historical Society, to preserve and enhance access to Minnesota's history and cultural heritage in all regions of the state. new text end new text begin (d) Statewide Survey of Historical and Archaeological Sites new text end new text begin $330,000 the first year and $330,000 the second year are for one or more contracts to be competitively awarded to conduct statewide surveys or investigations of Minnesota's sites of historical, archeological, and cultural significance. Results of the surveys or investigations must be published in a searchable form and available to the public cost free. The Minnesota Historical Society, the Office of the State Archeologist, the Indian Affairs Council, and the State Historic Preservation Office must each appoint a representative to an oversight board to select contractors and direct the conduct of the surveys or investigations. The oversight board must consult with the Departments of Transportation and Natural Resources. new text end new text begin (e) Digital Library new text end new text begin $330,000 the first year and $330,000 the second year are for a digital library project to preserve, digitize, and share Minnesota images, documents, and historical materials. The Minnesota Historical Society must cooperate with the Minitex interlibrary loan system and must jointly share this appropriation for these purposes. new text end new text begin (f) 250th Anniversary of the Declaration of Independence new text end new text begin $200,000 the first year is for Minnesota's commemoration of the 250th anniversary of the Declaration of Independence. The Minnesota Historical Society, the Minnesota America 250 Committee, and the Minnesota Humanities Center must work collaboratively to create public programs and activities and to support local efforts to commemorate this anniversary. A portion of this money may be used to support the work of the Minnesota America 250 Committee. new text end new text begin (g) Memorials and Statues new text end new text begin $950,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are for grants to community-based organizations and local units of government for statues and memorials commemorating the historical significance and cultural contributions of Minnesotans. The governing board of the Minnesota Historical Society must give priority consideration for funding under this paragraph to the city of St. Paul to design and construct a mural and statue honoring Tou Ger Xiong at Lake Phalen's Tou Ger Xiong Island in St. Paul; the city of Marshall to replace the historic bandshell at Liberty Park; the Dakota County Historical Society to design and build the Heroes and Heritage Interpretive Trail Loop along existing paved trails in South St. Paul, West St. Paul, and Inver Grove Heights; and the Forest Lake Veterans Memorial Committee to construct a memorial to veterans of the United States armed forces at Lakeside Memorial Park in the city of Forest Lake. new text end new text begin (h) 50 Years of Southeast Asians in Minnesota new text end new text begin $900,000 the first year is for competitive grants to eligible community organizations to commemorate 50 years of Southeast Asians in Minnesota. This funding is in addition to and for the same purposes as the grant program appropriated in Laws 2024, chapter 106, article 4, section 2, subdivision 6, paragraph (b), clause (2). Priority shall be given to applicants who did not receive a grant under the program administered under Laws 2024, chapter 106, article 4, section 2, subdivision 6, paragraph (b), clause (2). Any funds remaining may be used for the competitive grants program in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Grants new text end new text begin 125,000 new text end new text begin 125,000 new text end new text begin $125,000 the first year and $125,000 the second year are for a grant to Special Guerrilla Units Veterans and Families of USA, Inc. to collect, document, archive, and preserve the oral histories of Hmong veterans of the United States-sponsored Secret War in Laos and to create programming and educational resources to teach the public and future generations about the history, legacy, and cultural heritage of the Hmong in Minnesota. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATIONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,923,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,923,000 new text end new text begin $1,923,000 the first year and $2,923,000 the second year are appropriated to the commissioner of education for grants to the 12 Minnesota regional library systems to provide educational opportunities in the arts, history, literary arts, and cultural heritage of Minnesota. When possible, funding under this section should be used to promote and share the work of Minnesota authors, including authors from diverse backgrounds. This money must be allocated using the formulas in Minnesota Statutes, section 134.355, subdivisions 3 to 5, with the remaining 25 percent to be distributed to all qualifying systems in an amount proportionate to the number of qualifying system entities in each system. For purposes of this section, "qualifying system entity" means a public library, a regional library system, a regional library system headquarters, a county, or an outreach service program. This money may be used to sponsor programs provided by regional libraries or to provide grants to local arts and cultural heritage programs for programs in partnership with regional libraries. This money must be distributed in ten equal payments per year. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the appropriations encumbered on or before June 30, 2027, as grants or contracts in this section are available until June 30, 2029. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, up to two percent of the amount in this section is for administering the grants in this section. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIONnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 10,787,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 11,387,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grant Agreements new text end new text begin (a) The amounts in this section are appropriated to the commissioner of administration for grants to the named organizations for the purposes specified in this section. new text end new text begin (b) Grant agreements entered into by the commissioner and recipients of appropriations under this section must ensure that money appropriated in this section is used to supplement and not substitute for traditional sources of funding. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, up to three percent of the amounts in subdivision 3 are for administering the grants, providing fiscal oversight, and ensuring accountability in fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grants new text end new text begin 10,687,000 new text end new text begin 11,387,000 new text end new text begin (a) Minnesota Public Radio new text end new text begin $1,557,000 the first year and $2,057,000 the second year are for Minnesota Public Radio to create programming and expand news service on Minnesota's cultural heritage and history. new text end new text begin (b) Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations new text end new text begin $1,557,000 the first year and $2,057,000 the second year are to the Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations for production and acquisition grants in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.19. new text end new text begin (c) Public Television new text end new text begin $3,686,000 the first year and $4,686,000 the second year are to the Minnesota Public Television Association for production and acquisition grants according to Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.18. new text end new text begin (d) Wilderness Inquiry new text end new text begin $485,000 the first year and $485,000 the second year are to Wilderness Inquiry to preserve Minnesota's outdoor history, culture, and heritage by connecting Minnesota youth and families to natural resources. new text end new text begin (e) Como Park Zoo new text end new text begin $1,520,000 the first year and $1,520,000 the second year are to the Como Park Zoo and Conservatory for program development that features educational programs and habitat enhancement, special exhibits, music appreciation programs, and historical garden access and preservation. new text end new text begin (f) Science Museum of Minnesota new text end new text begin $450,000 the first year and $450,000 the second year are to the Science Museum of Minnesota for arts, arts education, and arts access and to preserve Minnesota's history and cultural heritage, including student and teacher outreach, statewide educational initiatives, and community-based exhibits that preserve Minnesota's history and cultural heritage. new text end new text begin (g) Lake Superior Zoo new text end new text begin $132,000 the first year and $132,000 the second year are to the Lake Superior Zoo to develop educational exhibits and programs. new text end new text begin (h) Taste of Minnesota new text end new text begin $1,300,000 the first year is for a grant to the Minneapolis Downtown Council to support the Taste of Minnesota event. This appropriation is for infrastructure and associated costs, including but not limited to event build-out, permits, waste management, staffing, security, equipment rentals, signs, and insurance. new text end new text begin (i) Minnesota African American Heritage Museum and Gallery new text end new text begin $100,000 the first year is for a grant to the Minnesota African American Heritage Museum and Gallery for cultural programming. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin MINNESOTA ZOOnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,490,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,150,000 new text end new text begin The amounts in this section are appropriated to the Minnesota Zoological Board for programs at and development of the Minnesota Zoological Garden and to provide access and education related to programs on the cultural heritage of Minnesota. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin MINNESOTA HUMANITIES CENTERnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 13,959,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 11,056,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grant Agreements new text end new text begin (a) The amounts in this section are appropriated to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for the purposes specified in this section. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the Minnesota Humanities Center may use up to 5.5 percent of the appropriations for the administration of these funds and to cover the cost of administering, planning, evaluating, and reporting these grants. The Minnesota Humanities Center must develop a written plan to issue the grants under this section and must submit the plan for review and approval by the commissioner of administration. The written plan must require the Minnesota Humanities Center to create and adhere to grant policies that are similar to those established according to Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.97, subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (1). new text end new text begin (b) No grants awarded under this section may be used for travel outside the state of Minnesota. The grant agreement must specify the repercussions for failing to comply with the grant agreement. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Programs new text end new text begin 1,912,000 new text end new text begin 1,762,000 new text end new text begin (a) $1,762,000 the first year and $1,762,000 the second year are for statewide humanities programs and to support and expand outreach, partnerships, and humanities programming with organizations and individuals throughout the state, including but not limited to programming related to veterans and the military experience; professional development opportunities for educators; and programming celebrating, representing, and reflecting upon the heritage of diverse Minnesota communities that have been historically underserved. new text end new text begin (b) $150,000 the first year is for a joint commemoration program, in collaboration with the Minnesota Historical Society for the 50th anniversary of the Vietnam War/Secret War in Laos/Southeast Asian conflict that recognizes and honors the contributions of veterans of the conflict. The Minnesota Humanities Center must build on the preparation and programming undertaken with the appropriation under Laws 2024, chapter 106, article 4, section 2, subdivision 5, paragraph (k). new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Children's Museum Grants new text end new text begin 2,157,000 new text end new text begin 2,157,000 new text end new text begin $2,157,000 the first year and $2,157,000 the second year are for arts and cultural heritage grants to children's museums for arts and cultural exhibits and related educational outreach programs. Of this amount: new text end new text begin (1) $500,000 each year is for the Minnesota Children's Museum, St. Paul; new text end new text begin (2) $175,000 each year is for The Works, Bloomington; new text end new text begin (3) $125,000 each year is for the WonderTrek Children's Museum, Brainerd-Baxter; new text end new text begin (4) $100,000 each year is for the Children's Discovery Center, Breckenridge; new text end new text begin (5) $125,000 each year is for the Duluth Children's Museum, Duluth; new text end new text begin (6) $100,000 each year is for the Otter Cove Children's Museum, Fergus Falls; new text end new text begin (7) $100,000 each year is for the Children's Discovery Museum, Grand Rapids; new text end new text begin (8) $100,000 each year is for the Wheel and Cog Children's Museum, Hutchinson; new text end new text begin (9) $175,000 each year is for the Children's Museum of Southern Minnesota, Mankato; new text end new text begin (10) $175,000 each year is for the Great River Children's Museum, St. Cloud; new text end new text begin (11) $100,000 each year is for The Village Children's Museum, Willmar; new text end new text begin (12) $100,000 each year is for the Mini Sota Ag Museum, Benson; new text end new text begin (13) $150,000 each year is for the SPARK Children's Museum, Rochester; and new text end new text begin (14) $132,000 each year is for the Bakken Museum, Minneapolis. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Community Identity and Heritage Emergency Grants new text end new text begin 200,000 new text end new text begin 200,000 new text end new text begin $200,000 the first year and $200,000 the second year are for emergency grants to organizations otherwise qualified to receive grants under subdivision 6 and must be awarded on a rolling basis based on emerging needs to assist communities responding to major events and to facilitate the process of grieving, encourage healing, create memorials, or assist in recovery of the community. Any amount described in the preceding sentence that is not expended by October 15 of the second year may be used for general programming costs or grants under subdivision 6. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Community Identity and Heritage Competitive Grant Program new text end new text begin 8,690,000 new text end new text begin 6,937,000 new text end new text begin (a) $8,690,000 the first year and $6,937,000 the second year are for a competitive grant program to provide grants to organizations or individuals working to create, celebrate, and teach the art, culture, and heritage of diverse Minnesota communities, with a priority on organizations from communities whose culture and heritage have been historically underrepresented or that have struggled to access culture and heritage resources in the past, including but not limited to Asian and Pacific Island communities, the Somali diaspora and other African immigrant communities, Indigenous communities with a focus on the 11 Tribes in Minnesota, the African American community, the Latinx community, the LGBTQIA+ community, and other underrepresented cultural groups, including communities of Black, Indigenous, and people of color, to celebrate the cultural diversity of Minnesota. An individual or organization that receives a grant under this subdivision must do at least one of the following: new text end new text begin (1) preserve and honor the cultural heritage of Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) provide education and student outreach on cultural diversity; new text end new text begin (3) support the development of culturally diverse humanities programming, including arts programming, by individuals and organizations; or new text end new text begin (4) empower communities in building identity and culture, including preserving and honoring communities whose Indigenous cultures are endangered or disappearing. new text end new text begin (b) At least 75 percent of the amount in paragraphs (c) to (f) must be for grants of less than $200,000. A grant awarded to an entity receiving priority consideration under paragraphs (c) to (f) must not exceed $200,000. new text end new text begin (c) Of the amount in paragraph (a), $2,218,000 the first year and $1,368,000 the second year are for grants to community-based organizations and local governments for museums, exhibits, and collections. The Minnesota Humanities Center must give priority consideration for funding under this paragraph to the Minnesota Fishing Museum and Hall of Fame, MN Zej Zog, and the Somali Museum of Minnesota. new text end new text begin (d) Of the amount in paragraph (a), $1,650,000 the first year and $2,750,000 the second year are for grants to community-based organizations and local governments to support arts and cultural festivals and events in the state of Minnesota. The Minnesota Humanities Center must give priority consideration for funding under this paragraph to Asian Economic Development Association for Minnesota Asian American film and music festivals, the Minnesota State Band to provide free concerts, Siengkane Lao for a Southeast Asian music festival, Stairstep Foundation, and Walker West Music Academy to provide free concerts. new text end new text begin (e) Of the amount in paragraph (a), $4,572,000 the first year and $2,569,000 the second year are for grants to community-based organizations and local governments for education and recreational programming and events. The Minnesota Humanities Center must give priority consideration for funding under this paragraph to Art from the Inside, Asian Economic Development Association for youth outdoor programs, Augsburg University for the Urban Debate League, Capri Theater, Comunidades Latinas Unidas En Servicio (CLUES), Fight for Your Dreams for youth boxing, the Governor's Council on Developmental Disabilities, HIRPHA International for Oromo youth programs, Hmong Cultural Center, the Lundstrum Center for the Performing Arts, organizations that provide arts programs in cultural malls in Moorhead and Maplewood, People in Action, the Phyllis Wheatley Community Center, Siengkane Lao to preserve traditional dance performances, and Sweet Potato Comfort Pie. new text end new text begin (f) Of the amount in paragraph (a), $250,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are for grants to provide funding to ethnic media organizations creating video content in a language other than English. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Underrepresented Groups Cultural Studies Materials new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $500,000 the first year is for competitive grants to develop high-quality academic, cultural, and ethnic studies materials for communities that do not have adequate cultural and ethnic studies materials or who are underrepresented in those materials, including but not limited to the Hmong, Karen, Somali, and Oromo cultures and cultures without a formal writing system that are largely oral-based. In developing these materials, a recipient of a grant under this subdivision must work with school districts that intend to use the materials. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Gordon Parks Commemoration new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $500,000 the first year is to work in collaboration with Soul Touch Productions to create an art installation and programming to celebrate the incredible life and rich legacy of Gordon Parks. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin INDIAN AFFAIRS COUNCILnew text end new text begin 2,030,000 new text end new text begin 2,030,000 new text end new text begin (a) $750,000 each year is to provide grants to Minnesota Tribal Nations to preserve Dakota and Ojibwe Indian language and to foster education programs and services for Dakota and Ojibwe language. new text end new text begin (b) $575,000 each year is for grants to Dakota and Ojibwe language-immersion educational institutions. new text end new text begin (c) $525,000 each year is to provide grants to preserve the Dakota and Ojibwe Indian language through support of projects and services and to support educational programs and immersion efforts in Dakota and Ojibwe language. new text end new text begin (d) $50,000 each year is for a Dakota and Ojibwe Indian language working group coordinated by the Indian Affairs Council. new text end new text begin (e) $130,000 each year is for the Indian Affairs Council to carry out responsibilities under Minnesota Statutes, section 307.08, to comply with Public Law 101-601, the Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 602,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 602,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin County Fair Grants new text end new text begin 352,000 new text end new text begin 352,000 new text end new text begin $352,000 the first year and $352,000 the second year are for grants to county agricultural societies to enhance arts access and education and to preserve and promote Minnesota's history and cultural heritage as embodied in its county fairs. The grants may be distributed in equal amounts to each of the county fairs that submitted an application. The grants are in addition to the aid distribution to county agricultural societies under Minnesota Statutes, section 38.02. The commissioner of agriculture must develop grant-making criteria and guidance for expending money under this subdivision to provide funding for projects and events that provide access to the arts or the state's agricultural, historical, and cultural heritage. The commissioner must seek input from all interested parties. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner may use up to two percent of the amounts in this subdivision for the administration and distribution of the grants. Money not used in the first year may be used in the second year. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Minnesota FFA new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end new text begin (a) $250,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are for grants to the Minnesota FFA to provide new and expanded access for Minnesota FFA members involved in art- and history-related FFA activities. Of this amount: new text end new text begin (1) up to $100,000 each year may be used to document and commemorate 100 years of fostering leadership, agricultural education, and community service across the state by creating a history book, video storytelling series, and an in-person arts-focused event; and new text end new text begin (2) any amount not spent for the purposes described in clause (1) may be used for other activities that provide new and expanded access for Minnesota FFA members involved in art- and history-related FFA activities, including activities related to national and state FFA band and choir, state and national FFA talent competitions, FFA floriculture, and FFA state fair landscape booths. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of agriculture must develop grant-making criteria and guidance for grants under this subdivision to provide funding for projects and events and must seek input from the Minnesota FFA and Minnesota FFA Foundation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner may use up to five percent of the amounts in this subdivision to cover the costs of administering, planning, evaluating, and reporting these grants. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin LEGISLATIVE COORDINATING COMMISSIONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 5,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin The amount in this section is appropriated to the Legislative Coordinating Commission to maintain the website required under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.303, subdivision 10. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 129D.17, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Expenditures; accountability. (a) Funding from the arts and cultural heritage fund may be spent only for arts, arts education, and arts access, and to preserve Minnesota's history and cultural heritage. A project or program receiving funding from the arts and cultural heritage fund must include measurable outcomes, and a plan for measuring and evaluating the results. A project or program must be consistent with current scholarship, or best practices, when appropriate and must incorporate state-of-the-art technology when appropriate. (b) Funding from the arts and cultural heritage fund may be granted for an entire project or for part of a project so long as the recipient provides a description and cost for the entire project and can demonstrate that it has adequate resources to ensure that the entire project will be completed. (c) Money from the arts and cultural heritage fund shall be expended for benefits across all regions and residents of the state. (d) A state agency or other recipient of a direct appropriation from the arts and cultural heritage fund must compile and submit all information for funded projects or programs, including the proposed measurable outcomes and all other items required under section 3.303, subdivision 10, to the Legislative Coordinating Commission as soon as practicable or by January 15 of the applicable fiscal year, whichever comes first. The Legislative Coordinating Commission must post submitted information on the website required under section 3.303, subdivision 10, as soon as it becomes available. (e) Grants funded by the arts and cultural heritage fund must be implemented according to section 16B.98 and must account for all expenditures of funds. Priority for grant proposals must be given to proposals involving grants that will be competitively awarded. (f) All money from the arts and cultural heritage fund must be for projects located in Minnesota. (g) When practicable, a direct recipient of an appropriation from the arts and cultural heritage fund shall prominently display on the recipient's website home page the legacy logo required under Laws 2009, chapter 172, article 5, section 10, as amended by Laws 2010, chapter 361, article 3, section 5, accompanied by the phrase "Click here for more information." When a person clicks on the legacy logo image, the website must direct the person to a web page that includes both the contact information that a person may use to obtain additional information, as well as a link to the Legislative Coordinating Commission website required under section 3.303, subdivision 10. (h) Future eligibility for money from the arts and cultural heritage fund is contingent upon a state agency or other recipient satisfying all applicable requirements in this section, as well as any additional requirements contained in applicable session law. If the Office of the Legislative Auditor, in the course of an audit or investigation, publicly reports that a recipient of money from the arts and cultural heritage fund has not complied with the laws, rules, or regulations in this section or other laws applicable to the recipient, the recipient must be listed in an annual report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over the legacy funds. The list must be publicly available. The legislative auditor shall remove a recipient from the list upon determination that the recipient is in compliance. A recipient on the list is not eligible for future funding from the arts and cultural heritage fund until the recipient demonstrates compliance to the legislative auditor. (i) Any state agency or organization requesting a direct appropriation from the arts and cultural heritage fund must inform the house of representatives and senate committees having jurisdiction over the arts and cultural heritage fund, at the time the request for funding is made, whether the request is supplanting or is a substitution for any previous funding that was not from a legacy fund and was used for the same purposenew text begin and provide a copy of the most recent year's Internal Revenue Service Form 990, Return of Organization Exempt From Income Taxnew text end . Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 129D.17, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Construction costs. new text end new text begin Money from the arts and cultural heritage fund must not be appropriated to fund new construction or for capital construction projects, including major renovations or long-term building projects, with the exception of preservation of historic structures or sites. This prohibition does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) accessibility accommodations; new text end new text begin (2) the creation of exhibits or installations; and new text end new text begin (3) renovations to provide care for collections or facilitate exhibits, installations, or other projects funded with arts and cultural heritage fund appropriations. new text end Sec. 14. Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 4, section 2, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Department of Education 3,000,000 2,750,000 (a) $2,750,000 each year is appropriated to the commissioner of education for grants to the 12 Minnesota regional library systems to provide educational opportunities in the arts, history, literary arts, and cultural heritage of Minnesota. When possible, funding under this subdivision should be used to promote and share the work of Minnesota authors, including authors from diverse backgrounds. This money must be allocated using the formulas in Minnesota Statutes, section 134.355, subdivisions 3 to 5, with the remaining 25 percent to be distributed to all qualifying systems in an amount proportionate to the number of qualifying system entities in each system. For purposes of this subdivision, "qualifying system entity" means a public library, a regional library system, a regional library system headquarters, a county, or an outreach service program. This money may be used to sponsor programs provided by regional libraries or to provide grants to local arts and cultural heritage programs for programs in partnership with regional libraries. This money must be distributed in ten equal payments per year. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the appropriations encumbered on or before June 30, deleted text begin 2025deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end , as grants or contracts in this subdivision are available until June 30, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end . (b) $250,000 the first year is appropriated to the commissioner of education for a water safety grant program. The commissioner of education must allocate grants to eligible applicants. Eligible applicants include nonprofit organizations and city and county parks and recreation programs providing swimming lessons to youth. Eligible applicants are not required to partner with other entities. Grant funds must primarily be used to provide scholarships to low-income and at-risk children for swimming lessons. Up to 15 percent of the grant funds may also be used to hire water safety instructors or lifeguards or train water safety instructors or lifeguards in nationally recognized water safety practices and instruction. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 15. Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 4, section 2, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Department of Administration 17,040,000 14,105,000 (a) The amounts in this subdivision are appropriated to the commissioner of administration for grants to the named organizations for the purposes specified in this subdivision. The commissioner of administration may use a portion of this appropriation for costs that are directly related to and necessary for the administration of grants in this subdivision. (b) Grant agreements entered into by the commissioner and recipients of appropriations under this subdivision must ensure that money appropriated in this subdivision is used to supplement and not substitute for traditional sources of funding. (c) Minnesota Public Radio $2,050,000 each year is for Minnesota Public Radio to create programming and expand news service on Minnesota's cultural heritage and history. (d) Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations $2,050,000 the first year and $2,050,000 the second year are to the Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations for production and acquisition grants in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.19. (e) Public Television $5,000,000 the first year and $4,500,000 the second year are to the Minnesota Public Television Association for production and acquisition grants according to Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.18. Of the amount in the first year, $1,000,000 is for producing Minnesota military and veterans' history stories and unique immigrant stories from around the state. (f) Wilderness Inquiry $500,000 the first year and $600,000 the second year are to Wilderness Inquiry to preserve Minnesota's outdoor history, culture, and heritage by connecting Minnesota youth and families to natural resources. (g) Como Park Zoo $1,725,000 each year is to the Como Park Zoo and Conservatory for program development that features educational programs and habitat enhancement, special exhibits, music appreciation programs, and historical garden access and preservation. (h) Science Museum of Minnesota $825,000 each year is to the Science Museum of Minnesota for arts, arts education, and arts access and to preserve Minnesota's history and cultural heritage, including student and teacher outreach, statewide educational initiatives, and community-based exhibits that preserve Minnesota's history and cultural heritage. (i) Appetite for Change $200,000 the first year is to the nonprofit Appetite for Change for the Community Cooks programming, which will preserve the cultural heritage of growing and cooking food in Minnesota. (j) Lake Superior Zoo $150,000 each year is to the Lake Superior Zoo to develop educational exhibits and programs. (k) Great Lakes Aquarium $250,000 each year is to the Lake Superior Center Authority to prepare, fabricate, and install a hands-on exhibit with interactive learning components to educate Minnesotans on the history of the natural landscape of the state. (l) State Band $25,000 the first year and $25,000 the second year are to the Minnesota state band to provide free concerts throughout the state. (m) Veterans Memorial Park in Wyoming $100,000 the first year is for a grant to the city of Wyoming to build the Veterans Memorial Plaza and related interpretive walk in Railroad Park. (n) Great Northern Festival $75,000 the first year and $75,000 the second year are for a grant to support the Great Northern Festival, which connects attendees to parks, outdoor spaces, and cultural venues through a festival. (o) Governor's Council on Developmental Disabilities $50,000 the first year is to the Minnesota Governor's Council on Developmental Disabilities to continue to preserve and raise awareness of the history of Minnesotans with developmental disabilities. (p) Minnesota Council on Disability $125,000 the first year and $125,000 the second year are to the Minnesota Council on Disability to provide educational opportunities in the arts, history, and cultural heritage of Minnesotans with disabilities in conjunction with the 50th anniversary of the Minnesota Council on Disability. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. (q) Keller Regional Park $500,000 the first year is for a grant to Ramsey County to preserve Minnesota's cultural heritage by enhancing the tuj lub courts at Keller Regional Park. (r) Vietnam War Anniversary $250,000 the first year is for a grant to the commissioner of veterans affairs to prepare and host a commemoration program for the 50th anniversary of the Vietnam War. (s) St. Paul Cultural Art Installation $500,000 the first year is for a grant to the city of St. Paul for an art installation celebrating Olympic gold medalist Suni Lee.new text begin The project funded by this paragraph must be located in St. Paul at the Conway Recreation Center or, if that site is not practicable, at Lake Phalen at the platform containing the bust of Suni Lee. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027.new text end (t) One Heartland Center $50,000 each year is for a grant to One Heartland Center for programming and outdoor activities for families and youth in Minnesota. (u) Forest Lake Veterans Memorial $100,000 the first year is for a grant to the Forest Lake Veterans Memorial Committee to construct a memorial to veterans of the United States armed forces at Lakeside Memorial Park in the city of Forest Lake. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. (v) Hmong Plaza $450,000 the first year is for a grant to the city of St. Paul to construct the Hmong Plaza at Phalen Lake. (w) Camille Gage Artist Fellowship $55,000 the first year and $55,000 the second year are for a grant to YWCA Minneapolis to fund an annual fellowship to be known as the Camille J. Gage Artist Fellowship. Of this amount, up to $5,000 each year may be used for administrative expenses. YWCA Minneapolis must select a person for the Camille J. Gage Artist Fellowship after an application process that allows both applications by interested persons and nominations of persons by third parties. By October 1, 2026, YWCA Minneapolis must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over legacy on the use of money appropriated under this paragraph and on the activities of the person selected for the Camille J. Gage Artist Fellowship under this paragraph. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2026. (x) Minnesota African American Heritage Museum and Gallery $235,000 the first year and $125,000 the second year are for arts and cultural heritage programming celebrating African American and Black communities in Minnesota. Of the amount in the first year, $110,000 is for C. Caldwell Fine Arts for an outdoor mural project in North Minneapolis to work with young people to develop skills while using art as the impetus. (y) Tibetan American Foundation of Minnesota $25,000 the first year and $25,000 the second year are for a grant to the Tibetan American Foundation of Minnesota to celebrate and teach the art, culture, and heritage of Tibetan Americans in Minnesota. (z) Hong De Wu Guan $25,000 the first year is for a grant to Hong De Wu Guan to create cultural arts projects like Lion Dance for after-school programs for youth. (aa) Sepak Takraw of USA $50,000 the first year is for a grant to the Sepak Takraw of USA to work with youth and after-school programs in the community to teach the cultural games of tuj lub and sepak takraw. This appropriation may not be used to hold events. (bb) 30,000 Feet $75,000 the first year and $75,000 the second year are for a grant to 30,000 Feet, a nonprofit organization, to help youth and community artists further develop their artistic skills, to create community art and artistic performances, and to promote and share African American history and culture through the arts. (cc) Siengkane Lao Minnesota $50,000 the first year and $50,000 the second year are for a grant to Siengkane Lao MN to create cultural arts projects and to preserve traditional performances. (dd) Hmong Cultural Center $150,000 the first year and $150,000 the second year are for a grant to the Hmong Cultural Center of Minnesota for museum-related programming and educational outreach activities to teach the public about the historical, cultural, and folk arts heritage of Hmong Minnesotans. (ee) Comunidades Latinas Unidas En Servicio $250,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are for a grant to Comunidades Latinas Unidas En Servicio (CLUES) to expand arts programming to celebrate Latino cultural heritage; support local artists; and provide professional development, networking, and presentation opportunities. (ff) Hmong RPA Writing System $300,000 the first year and $300,000 the second year are for grants to recipients who have demonstrated knowledge and interest in preserving Hmong culture to preserve Hmong Minnesotans' heritage, history, language, and culture. Grants must be used in conjunction with Minnesota universities to improve and develop a unified and standardized Latin alphabet form of the Hmong RPA writing system. No portion of this appropriation may be used to encourage religious membership or to conduct personal ceremonies or events.new text begin This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028.new text end (gg) Somali Museum of Minnesota $125,000 the first year and $125,000 the second year are for a grant to the Somali Museum of Minnesota for heritage arts and cultural vitality programs to provide classes, exhibits, presentations, and outreach about the Somali community and heritage in Minnesota. (hh) Minnesota Museum of American Art $200,000 the first year and $200,000 the second year are for a grant to the Minnesota Museum of American Art for exhibit programming and for a Native American Fellowship at the museum. (ii) Fanka Programs $250,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are for a grant to Ka Joog statewide Somali-based collaborative programs for arts and cultural heritage. The funding must be used for Fanka programs to provide arts education and workshops, mentor programs, and community presentations and community engagement events throughout Minnesota. (jj) The Bakken Museum $150,000 the first year is for a grant to The Bakken Museum for interactive exhibits and outreach programs on arts and cultural heritage. (kk) 4-H Shooting Sports $50,000 the first year is to the University of Minnesota Extension Office to provide grants to Minnesota 4-H chapters that have members participating in state and national 4-H-sanctioned shooting sports events. Eligible costs for grant money include shooting sports equipment and supplies and event fees associated with participating in state shooting sports events. (ll) Public Art Saint Paul $75,000 each year is for a grant to Public Art Saint Paul for art programming at the Wakpa Triennial Art Festival to showcase new art across the Twin Cities by Minnesota artists in outdoor and indoor settings and to encourage visitors to experience the arts and culture produced by local arts and culture organizations. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 16. Laws 2024, chapter 106, article 4, section 2, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Minnesota Historical Society -0- 1,201,000 (a) The amounts in this subdivision are appropriated to the governing board of the Minnesota Historical Society to preserve and enhance access to Minnesota's history and its cultural and historical resources. Grant agreements entered into by the Minnesota Historical Society and other recipients of appropriations in this subdivision must ensure that these funds are used to supplement and not substitute for traditional sources of funding. Funds directly appropriated to the Minnesota Historical Society must be used to supplement and not substitute for traditional sources of funding. The appropriations in this subdivision are onetime. (b) Grants (1) $100,000 the second year is to facilitate negotiations for the purchase by the state of the Wizard of Oz ruby slippers through a combination of available state funds and nonstate sources of fundingnew text begin . Any remaining amount not used to facilitate the purchase of the slippers by the state may be used as a grant to the Judy Garland Children's Discovery Museum to create an exhibit highlighting the history and cultural relevance of the slippersnew text end ; (2) $400,000 the second year is for statewide historic and cultural grants to cultural community organizations, historical organizations, and veterans organizations for activities to commemorate 50 years of Southeast Asians in Minnesota. Money under this paragraph must be distributed through a competitive grant process. The Minnesota Historical Society must administer the grants using established grant mechanisms with assistance from the advisory committee created under Laws 2009, chapter 172, article 4, section 2, subdivision 4, paragraph (b), item (ii). (3) $200,000 the second year is for activities to prepare and coordinate community commemoration programs celebrating 50 years of Hmong Americans in Minnesota. The Minnesota Historical Society must form an advisory task force consisting of members of the Hmong community to advise the society on the design and implementation of these activities and programs; (4) $200,000 the second year is for planning and outreach, in collaboration with the Minnesota Humanities Center, for Minnesota's commemoration of the 250th anniversary of the signing of the Declaration of Independence. The Minnesota Historical Society and Minnesota Humanities Center must enter into an agreement between the organizations on how best to maximize the impact of this grant and of collaboration with statewide partners; (5) $50,000 the second year is for a grant to the Greater Litchfield Opera House Association to repair and update the Litchfield Opera House; and (6) $251,000 the second year is for a grant to the Dakota County Historical Society to design and build exhibits at the Lawshe Memorial Museum. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 17. new text begin GRANTS TO UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES.new text end new text begin (a) A fiscal agent that administers a competitive grant program under this article must ensure that at least 48 percent of the amount awarded each fiscal year under the program is for grants to organizations that serve underserved communities and that agree to provide the fiscal agent with detailed information about the manner in which the grantee serves those communities. The fiscal agent must include this information in the next report submitted by the fiscal agent under Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.17, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, "underserved communities" means communities whose culture and heritage have been historically underrepresented or that have struggled to access culture and heritage resources in the past, specifically the Asian and Pacific Island communities, the Somali diaspora and other African immigrant communities, Indigenous communities with a focus on the 11 Tribes in Minnesota, the African American community, the Latinx community, the LGBTQIA+ community, Minnesotans with disabilities, and other communities of people of color who have traditionally suffered from inadequate access to resources. new text end